Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-346
Decree of divorce; validity.

When any district court in this state has entered a decree of divorce after August 27, 1951, and when any county court in this state has entered a decree of divorce on or after October 1, 1997, it shall be conclusively presumed that the decree, and all instruments and proceedings in connection therewith are valid in all respects, notwithstanding some defect or defects as may appear on the face of the record or the absence of any record of such court, unless an action is brought within two years from the entry of such decree of divorce attacking the validity thereof.

Laws 1951, c. 122, § 2, p. 536;

Laws 1996, LB 1296, § 9.